Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 52 PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOLS
33-5206. Requirements and prohibitions of a public charter school.

In addition to any other requirements imposed in this chapter, a public charter school shall be nonsectarian in its programs, affiliations, admission policies, employment practices, and all other operations, shall not charge tuition, levy taxes or issue bonds, and shall not discriminate against any student on any basis prohibited by the federal or state constitution or any federal, state or local law. Public charter schools shall comply with the federal individuals with disabilities education act. Admission to a public charter school shall not be determined according to the place of residence of the student, or of the student’s parent or guardian within the district, except that a new replication or conversion public charter school established under the provisions of this chapter shall adopt and maintain a policy giving admission preference to students who reside within the contiguous and compact primary attendance area of that public charter school.

No board of trustees shall require any employee of the school district to be involuntarily assigned to work in a public charter school.

Certified teachers in a public charter school shall be considered public school teachers. Educational experience shall accrue for service in a public charter school and such experience shall be counted by any school district for any teacher who has been employed in a public charter school. The staff of the public charter school shall be considered a separate unit for the purposes of collective bargaining.

Employment of charter school teachers and administrators shall be on written contract conditioned upon a valid certificate being held by such professional personnel at the time of entering upon the duties thereunder. Administrators may be certified pursuant to the requirements set forth in chapter 12, title 33, Idaho Code, pertaining to traditional public schools, or may hold a charter school administrator certificate. An applicant is eligible for a charter school administrator certificate if the applicant:

Holds a bachelor’s degree from an accredited four (4) year institution;

Submits to a criminal history check as described in section 33-130, Idaho Code;

Completes a course consisting of a minimum of three (3) semester credits in the statewide framework for teacher evaluations, which shall include a laboratory component;

Submits a letter from a charter school board of directors stating that the board of directors has carefully considered the applicant’s candidacy, has chosen to hire the applicant, and is committed to overseeing the applicant’s performance; and

Has one (1) or more of the following:

Five (5) or more years of experience administering a public charter school;

A post-baccalaureate degree and a minimum of five (5) years of experience in school administration, public administration, business administration, or military administration;

Successful completion of a nationally recognized charter school leaders fellowship; or

Five (5) or more years of teaching experience and a commitment from an administrator at a charter school in academic, operational, and financial good standing according to its authorizer’s most recent review to mentor the applicant for a minimum of one (1) year.
A charter school administrator certificate shall be valid for five (5) years and renewable thereafter. Administrators shall be subject to oversight by the professional standards commission. Certificates may be revoked pursuant to the provisions of section 33-1208, Idaho Code. Issuance of a certificate to any applicant may be refused for such reason as would have constituted grounds for revocation.

No board of trustees shall require any student enrolled in the school district to attend a public charter school.

Authorized chartering entities may establish reasonable pre-opening requirements or conditions to monitor the start-up progress of newly approved public charter schools and ensure that they are prepared to open smoothly on the date agreed, and to ensure that each school meets all building, health, safety, insurance and other legal requirements for school opening.

Each public charter school shall annually submit the audit of its fiscal operations to the authorized chartering entity.

A public charter school or the authorized chartering entity may enter into negotiations to revise a charter or performance certificate at any time. If a public charter school petitions to revise its charter or performance certificate, the authorized chartering entity’s review of the revised petition shall be limited in scope solely to the proposed revisions. Except for public charter schools authorized by a school district board of trustees, when a non-virtual public charter school submits a proposed charter revision to its authorized chartering entity and such revision includes a proposal to increase such public charter school’s approved student enrollment cap by ten percent (10%) or more, the authorized chartering entity shall hold a public hearing on such petition. The authorized chartering entity shall provide the board of the local school district in which the public charter school is physically located notice in writing of such hearing no later than thirty (30) days prior to the hearing. The public hearing shall include any oral or written comments that an authorized representative of the school district in which the public charter school is physically located may provide regarding the impact of the proposed charter revision upon the school district. Such public hearing shall also include any oral or written comments that any petitioner may provide regarding the impact of the proposed charter revision upon such school district.

When a charter is nonrenewed pursuant to the provisions of section 33-5209B, Idaho Code, revoked pursuant to section 33-5209C, Idaho Code, or the board of directors of the public charter school terminates the charter, the assets of the public charter school remaining after all debts of the public charter school have been satisfied must be returned to the authorized chartering entity for distribution in accordance with applicable law.

Public charter schools may contract with educational services providers subject to the following provisions:

Educational services providers, whether for-profit or nonprofit, shall be third-party entities separate from the public charter schools with which they contract. Educational services providers shall not be considered governmental entities.

No more than one-third (1/3) of the public charter school’s board membership may be comprised of nonprofit educational services provider representatives. Nonprofit educational services provider representatives may not be employees of the public charter school or the educational services provider and may not hold office as president or treasurer on the public charter school’s board. For-profit educational services providers may not have representatives on the public charter school’s board of directors.

Public charter school board of director members shall annually disclose any existing and potential conflicts of interest, pecuniary or otherwise, with affiliated educational services providers.

Charter holders shall retain responsibility for academic, fiscal and organizational operations and outcomes of the school and may not relinquish this responsibility to any other entity.

Contracts must ensure that school boards retain the right to terminate the contract for failure to meet defined performance standards.

Contracts must ensure that assets purchased by educational services providers on behalf of the school, using public funds, shall remain assets of the school. The provisions of this paragraph shall not prevent educational services providers from acquiring assets using revenue acquired through management fees.

Charter holders shall consult legal counsel independent of the party with whom they are contracting for purposes of reviewing the school’s management contract and facility lease or purchase agreements to ensure compliance with applicable state and federal law, including requirements that state entities not enter into contracts that obligate them beyond the terms of any appropriation of funds by the state legislature.

Charter holders must ensure that their facility contracts are separate from any and all management contracts.

Prior to approval of the charter petition indicating the school board’s intention to contract with an educational services provider, authorized chartering entities shall conduct a thorough evaluation of the academic, financial and organizational outcomes of other schools that have contracted with the educational services provider and evidence of the educational services provider’s capacity to successfully grow the public charter school while maintaining quality management and instruction in existing schools.

Admission procedures, including provision for overenrollment, shall provide that the initial admission procedures for a new public charter school or replication public charter school will be determined by lottery or other random method, except as otherwise provided herein.

If initial capacity is insufficient to enroll all pupils who submit a timely application, then the admission procedures may provide that preference shall be given in the following order: first, to children of founders, provided that this admission preference shall be limited to not more than ten percent (10%) of the capacity of the public charter school; second, to siblings of pupils already selected by the lottery or other random method; third, to pupils seeking to transfer from another Idaho public charter school at which they have been enrolled for at least one (1) year, provided that this admission preference shall be subject to an existing written agreement for such preference between the subject charter schools; fourth, to students residing within the primary attendance area of the public charter school; and fifth, by an equitable selection process such as a lottery or other random method. If so stated in its petition, a public charter school may weight the school’s lottery to preference admission for the following educationally disadvantaged students: students living at or below one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of the federal poverty level, students who are homeless or in foster care, children with disabilities as defined in section 33-2001, Idaho Code, students with limited English proficiency, and students who are at-risk as defined in section 33-1001, Idaho Code. If so stated in its petition, a new public charter school or replication public charter school may include the children of full-time employees of the public charter school within the first priority group subject to the limitations therein. Otherwise, such children shall be included in the highest priority group for which they would otherwise be eligible.
(b) If capacity is insufficient to enroll all pupils who submit a timely application for subsequent school terms, then the admission procedures may provide that preference shall be given in the following order: first, to pupils returning to the public charter school in the second or any subsequent year of its operation; second, to children of founders, provided that this admission preference shall be limited to not more than ten percent (10%) of the capacity of the public charter school; third, to siblings of pupils already enrolled in the public charter school; fourth, to pupils seeking to transfer from another Idaho public charter school at which they have been enrolled for at least one (1) year, provided that this admission preference shall be subject to an existing written agreement for such preference between the subject charter schools; fifth, to students residing within the primary attendance area of the public charter school; and sixth, by an equitable selection process such as a lottery or other random method. There shall be no carryover from year to year of the list maintained to fill vacancies. A new lottery shall be conducted each year to fill vacancies that become available. If so stated in its petition, a public charter school may weight the school’s lottery to preference admission for the following educationally disadvantaged students: students living at or below one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of the federal poverty level, students who are homeless or in foster care, children with disabilities as defined in section 33-2001, Idaho Code, students with limited English proficiency, and students who are at-risk as defined in section 33-1001, Idaho Code. If so stated in its petition, a public charter school may include the following children within the second priority group subject to the limitations therein:

The children of full-time employees of the public charter school; and

Children who attended the public charter school within the previous three (3) school years, but who withdrew as a result of the relocation of a parent or guardian due to an academic sabbatical, employer or military transfer or reassignment.

Public charter schools shall comply with section 33-119, Idaho Code, as it applies to secondary school accreditation.

Public charter school students shall be tested with the same standardized tests as other Idaho public school students.

(c) Each public charter school shall establish a process under which a child may apply for enrollment or register for courses, regardless of where such child resides at the time of application or registration, if the child is a dependent of a member of the United States armed forces who has received transfer orders to a location in Idaho and will, upon such transfer, reside in an area served by the public charter school. If capacity is insufficient as described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, a child described in this paragraph shall be treated as a student residing within the primary attendance area of the public charter school for purposes of preference.

Otherwise, such children shall be included in the highest priority group for which they would otherwise be eligible.

33-5207. Charter appeal procedure.

If a local school board of trustees, acting in its capacity as an authorized chartering entity, approves a petition for the conversion of an existing traditional public school within the school district over the objection of thirty (30) or more persons or employees of the district, or if an authorized chartering entity denies a petition for the establishment of a new or replication public charter school for any reason including, but not limited to, failure by the petitioner to follow procedures or for failure to provide required information, then such decisions may be appealed to the state superintendent of public instruction within thirty (30) days of the date of the written decision, at the request of persons opposing the conversion of an existing traditional public school, or at the request of the petitioner whose request for a new charter was denied.

The state superintendent of public instruction shall select a hearing officer to review the action of the authorized chartering entity, pursuant to section 67-5242, Idaho Code. The hearing officer shall, within thirty (30) days of receipt of the request, review the full record regarding the charter petition and convene a public hearing regarding the charter petition. Within ten (10) days of the public hearing, the hearing officer shall submit a written recommendation to the authorized chartering entity and to the persons requesting the review. The recommendation by the hearing officer either to affirm or reverse the decision of the authorized chartering entity shall be based upon the full record regarding the charter petition, including the standards and criteria contained in this chapter and upon any public charter school rules adopted by the state board of education. The recommendation shall be in writing and accompanied by a reasoned statement that explains the criteria and standards considered relevant, states the relevant contested facts relied upon, and explains the rationale for the recommendations based on the applicable statutory provisions and factual information contained in the record.

Within thirty (30) days following receipt of the hearing officer’s written recommendation, the authorized chartering entity shall hold a meeting open to the public for the purpose of reviewing the hearing officer’s written recommendation. Within ten (10) days of such meeting, the authorized chartering entity shall either affirm or reverse its initial decision. The authorized chartering entity’s decision shall be in writing and contain findings which explain the reasons for its decision.

If, upon reconsideration of a decision to approve the conversion of a traditional public school to a public charter school, the local school board:

Affirms its initial decision to authorize such conversion, the charter shall be approved and there shall be no further appeal.

Reverses its initial decision and denies the conversion, that decision is final and there shall be no further appeal.

If, upon reconsideration of a decision to deny a petition for a public charter school, the authorized chartering entity:

Reverses its initial decision and approves the public charter school petition, there shall be no further appeal.
(b) Affirms its initial decision denying the public charter school petition, the board of directors of the nonprofit corporation identified in the petition may appeal to the state board of education. The state board of education shall hold a public hearing within a reasonable time after receiving notice of such appeal but no later than sixty (60) calendar days after receiving such notice, and after the public hearing, shall take any of the following actions: (i) approve or deny the petition for the public charter school, provided that the state board of education shall only approve the petition if it determines that the authorized chartering entity failed to appropriately consider the charter petition, or if it acted in an arbitrary manner in denying the petition; or (ii) in the case of a denial by the board of a local school district, redirect the matter to the public charter school commission for further review. Such public hearing shall be conducted pursuant to procedures as set by the state board of education.

A public charter school for which a charter is approved by the state board of education shall qualify fully as a public charter school for all funding and other purposes of this chapter. The public charter school commission shall assume the role of the authorized chartering entity for any charter approved by the state board of education as provided in subsection (5)(b) of this section. Employees of a public charter school approved by the state board of education shall not be considered employees of the local school district in which the public charter school is located, nor of the state board of education, nor of the commission.

The decision of the state board of education shall be subject to review pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. Nothing in this section shall prevent a petitioner from bringing a new petition for a public charter school at a later time.

There shall be no appeal of a decision by a local school board of trustees which denies the conversion of an existing traditional public school within that district to a public charter school, or by an authorized chartering entity which approves a petition for a public charter school.

33-5208. Public charter school financial support.

Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, from the state educational support program the state department of education shall make the following apportionment to each public charter school for each fiscal year based on attendance figures submitted in a manner and time as required by the department of education:

Per student support. Computation of support units for each public charter school shall be calculated as if it were a separate school according to the schedules in section 33-1002(4), Idaho Code, except that public charter schools with fewer than one hundred (100) secondary ADA shall use a divisor of twelve (12) and the minimum units shall not apply, and no public charter school shall receive an increase in support units that exceeds the support units it received in the prior year by more than thirty (30). Funding from the state educational support program shall be equal to the total distribution factor, plus the salary-based apportionment provided in chapter 10, title 33, Idaho Code. Provided however, any public charter school that is formed by the conversion of an existing traditional public school shall be assigned divisors, pursuant to section 33-1002, Idaho Code, that are no lower than the divisors of the school district in which the traditional public school is located, for each category of pupils listed.

Special education. For each student enrolled in the public charter school who is entitled to special education services, the state and federal funds from the exceptional child education program for that student that would have been apportioned for that student to the school district in which the public charter school is located.

Alternative school support. Public charter schools may qualify under the provisions of sections 33-1002 and 33-1002C, Idaho Code, provided the public charter school meets the necessary statutory requirements, and students qualify for attendance at an alternative school as provided by rule of the state board of education.

Transportation support. Support shall be paid to the public charter school as provided in chapter 15, title 33, Idaho Code, and section 33-1006, Idaho Code. Each public charter school shall furnish the department with an enrollment count as of the first Friday in November, of public charter school students who are eligible for reimbursement of transportation costs under the provisions of this subsection and who reside more than one and one-half (1 ½) miles from the school. The state department of education is authorized to include in the annual appropriation to the charter school sixty percent (60%) of the estimated transportation cost. The final appropriation payment in July shall reflect reimbursements of actual costs pursuant to section 33-1006, Idaho Code. To be eligible for state reimbursement under the provisions of section 33-1006, Idaho Code, the student to be transported must reside within the public charter school’s primary attendance area, and must meet at least one (1) of the following two (2) criteria:

The student resides within the school district in which the public charter school is physically located; or

The student resides within fifteen (15) miles of the public charter school, by road.

Facilities funds. The state department of education shall distribute facilities funds to public charter schools for each enrolled student in which a majority of the student’s instruction is received at a facility that is owned or leased by the public charter school. Such funds shall be used to defray the purchase, fee, loan or lease costs associated with payments for real property used by the students or employees of the public charter school for educational or administrative purposes. Such funds shall be distributed from the moneys appropriated to the educational support program and shall be calculated as a percentage of the statewide average amount of bond and plant facility funds levied per student by Idaho school districts, as follows:
Fiscal Year 2014

Payment schedule. The state department of education is authorized to make an advance payment of twenty-five percent (25%) of a public charter school’s estimated annual apportionment for its first year of operation, and each year thereafter, provided the public charter school is serving more grades or at least ten percent (10%) more classes than the previous year, to assist the school with initial start-up costs or payroll obligations. For a public charter school entering its second or greater year of operations, the state department of education may require documentation establishing the need for such an advance payment, including comparative class schedules and proof of a commensurate increase in the number of employees.

For a public charter school to receive the advance payment, the school shall submit its anticipated fall membership for each grade level to the state department of education by June 1.

Using the figures provided by the public charter school, the state department of education shall determine an estimated annual apportionment from which the amount of the advance payment shall be calculated. Advance payment shall be made to the school on or after July 1 but no later than July 31.

All subsequent payments, taking into account the onetime advance payment made for the first year of operation, shall be made to the public charter school in the same manner as other traditional public schools in accordance with the provisions of section 33-1009, Idaho Code.
A public charter school shall comply with all applicable fiscal requirements of law, except that the following provisions shall not be applicable to public charter schools: that portion of section 33-1004, Idaho Code, relating to reduction of the administrative and instructional staff allowance and the pupil service staff allowance when there is a discrepancy between the number allowed and the number actually employed; and section 33-1004E, Idaho Code, for calculation of district staff indices.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit any private person or organization from providing funding or other financial assistance to the establishment or operation of a public charter school.

Each public charter school shall pay an authorizer fee to its authorized chartering entity, to defray the actual documented cost of monitoring, evaluation and oversight, which, in the case of public charter schools authorized by the public charter school commission, shall include each school’s proportional fee share of moneys appropriated from the public charter school authorizers fund to the public charter school commission, plus fifteen percent (15%). Provided however, that each public charter school’s board of directors may direct up to ten percent (10%) of the calculated fee to pay membership fees to an organization or association that provides technical assistance, training and advocacy for Idaho public charter schools. Unless the authorized chartering entity declines payment, such fee shall be paid by March 15 of each fiscal year and shall not exceed the greater of:

All state funds distributed to public schools on a support unit basis for the prior fiscal year, divided by the statewide number of public school students in average daily attendance in the first reporting period in the prior fiscal year; or

The lesser of:

The result of the calculation in paragraph (a) of this subsection, multiplied by four (4); or

One and one-half percent (1.5%) of the result of the calculation in paragraph (a) of this subsection, multiplied by the public charter school’s average daily attendance in the first reporting period in the current fiscal year.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a public charter school from applying for federal grant moneys or for career technical education funding of any source for any reason including, but not limited to, the instructional delivery method.

Each student in attendance at a public virtual school shall be funded based upon either the actual hours of attendance in the public virtual school on a flexible schedule, or the percentage of coursework completed, whichever is more advantageous to the school, up to the maximum of one (1) full-time equivalent student.
(10)(a) Each student in attendance at a public virtual school shall be funded based upon either the actual hours of attendance in the public virtual school on a flexible schedule, or the percentage of coursework completed, whichever is more advantageous to the school, up to the maximum of one (1) full-time equivalent student.

All federal educational funds shall be administered and distributed to public charter schools, including public virtual schools, that have been designated as a local education agency (LEA), as provided in section 33-5203(8), Idaho Code.

Nothing in this section prohibits separate face-to-face learning activities or services. In order to be eligible for career technical education essential components funding, virtual schools may be required to offer some face-to-face instruction in order to meet industry standards, licensing requirements, work-based learning requirements, or other requirements set forth by the board.

The limitations placed by this subsection on the reimbursement of transportation costs for certain students shall not apply to public virtual schools.

Twenty Percent (20%)

Fiscal Year 2015

Thirty Percent (30%)

For fiscal year 2016 and each fiscal year thereafter, this percentage shall increase by ten percent (10%) each time the total appropriation of state funds for the educational support program increases by three percent (3%) or more over the prior fiscal year and shall decrease by ten percent (10%) each time the total appropriation of state funds for the educational support program decreases as compared to the prior fiscal year. Provided however, that the percentage shall be no less than twenty percent (20%) and no greater than fifty percent (50%), and that the average amount of funding received per public charter school shall not exceed the average amount of funding received by each school district pursuant to the provisions of section 33-906, Idaho Code.

For those public charter schools that do not receive facilities funds for all enrolled students, the school may submit to the state department of education a reimbursement claim for any costs for which facilities funds may be used. The state department of education shall reduce such claim by the greater of fifty percent (50%) or the percentage of the school’s enrolled students for which the school receives facilities funds and shall pay the balance. Provided however, that the total reimbursements paid to a public charter school, in combination with any facilities stipend received by the school, shall not exceed the amount of facilities funds that would have been received by the school had the school received facilities funds for all enrolled students. For the purposes of this subsection, the term “real property” shall be used as defined in section 63-201, Idaho Code.

33-5209. Enforcement — Revocation

Appeal. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 343, § 10, effective July 1, 2013.

33-5209A. Accountability.

Performance framework. The performance provisions within the performance certificate shall be based upon a performance framework that clearly sets forth the academic and operational performance indicators, measures and metrics that will guide the authorized chartering entity’s evaluations of each public charter school. The performance framework shall include indicators, measures and metrics for, at a minimum:

Student academic proficiency;

Student academic growth;

College and career readiness (for high schools); and

Board performance and stewardship, including compliance with all applicable laws, regulations and terms of the performance certificate.

Measurable performance targets shall be set by each charter holder for each public charter school for which it holds a charter in conjunction with its authorized chartering entity and shall, at a minimum, require that each school meet applicable federal, state and authorized chartering entity goals for student achievement.

The performance framework shall allow the inclusion of additional rigorous, valid and reliable indicators proposed by a charter holder to augment external evaluations of its performance, provided that the authorized chartering entity approves the quality and rigor of such proposed indicators, and that they are consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

For each public charter school it oversees, the authorized chartering entity shall be responsible for analyzing and reporting all data from state assessments in accordance with the performance framework.

33-5209B. Charter renewals.

A charter may be renewed for successive five (5) year terms of duration. An authorized chartering entity may grant renewal with specific, written conditions for necessary improvements to a public charter school. Any such specific, written conditions shall state the date by which the conditions must be met.

Following the initial three (3) year term, an authorized chartering entity may nonrenew or grant renewal for an additional five (5) years, based upon the performance of the public charter school on the performance indicators, measures and metrics contained in the performance certificate. Subsequent renewals shall be for a term of five (5) years.

No later than November 15, the authorized chartering entity shall issue a public charter school performance report and charter renewal application guidance to any charter holder with a public charter school whose charter will expire the following year. The performance report shall summarize the public charter school’s performance record to date, based upon the data required by this chapter and the performance certificate, and shall provide notice of any weaknesses or concerns determined by the authorized chartering entity concerning the public charter school that may jeopardize its position in seeking renewal, if not timely rectified. The charter holder shall have thirty (30) days to respond to the performance report and submit any corrections or clarifications for the report.

The renewal application guidance shall, at a minimum, provide an opportunity for the charter holder to:

Present additional evidence, beyond the data contained in the performance report, supporting its case for charter renewal; and

Describe improvements undertaken or planned for the school.

The renewal application guidance shall include or refer explicitly to the criteria that will guide the authorized chartering entity’s renewal decisions, which shall be based on independent fiscal audits and the performance framework set forth in the performance certificate.

No later than December 15, the charter holder seeking renewal shall submit a renewal application to the authorized chartering entity pursuant to the renewal application guidance issued by the authorized chartering entity. The authorized chartering entity shall vote on the renewal application no later than March 15.

In making charter renewal decisions, every authorized chartering entity shall:

Ground its decisions in evidence of the school’s performance over the term of the performance certificate in accordance with the performance framework set forth in the performance certificate;

Ensure that data used in making renewal decisions are available to the school and the public; and

Provide a public report summarizing the evidence basis for each decision.

An authorized chartering entity must develop revocation and nonrenewal processes that:

Provide the charter holders with a timely notification of the prospect of revocation or nonrenewal and of the reasons for such possible closure, which shall be limited to failure to meet the terms of the performance certificate or the written conditions established pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section;

Allow the charter holders a reasonable amount of time in which to prepare a response;

Provide the charter holders with an opportunity to submit documents and give testimony challenging the rationale for closure and in support of the continuation of the school at an orderly proceeding held for that purpose;

Allow the charter holders to be represented by counsel and to call witnesses on their behalf;

Permit the recording of such proceedings; and

After a reasonable period for deliberation, require a final determination to be made and conveyed in writing to the charter holders.

An authorized chartering entity shall renew any charter in which the public charter school met all of the terms of its performance certificate at the time of renewal. An authorized chartering entity may renew or nonrenew any charter in which the public charter school failed to meet one (1) or more of the terms of its performance certificate.